hunspell/cy/cy.aff
SFX B Y 204
SFX B   nu          naf        nu
SFX B   nu          ni         nu
SFX B   nu          ni'i       nu
SFX B   nu          ni'u       nu
SFX B   nu          ni'ch      nu
SFX B   nu          ni'n       nu
SFX B   nu          ni'r       nu
SFX B   nu          na         nu
SFX B   nu          na'i       nu
SFX B   nu          na'u       nu
SFX B   nu          na'ch      nu
SFX B   nu          na'n       nu
SFX B   nu          na'r       nu
SFX B   nu          nwn        nu
SFX B   nu          nwch       nu
SFX B   nu          nant       nu
SFX B   nu          nir        nu
SFX B   nu          nit        nu
SFX B   nu          net        nu
SFX B   nu          nai        nu
SFX B   nu          nai'i      nu
SFX B   nu          nai'u      nu
SFX B   nu          nai'ch     nu
SFX B   nu          nai'n      nu
SFX B   nu          nai'r      nu
SFX B   nu          nem        nu
SFX B   nu          nech       nu
SFX B   nu          nent       nu
SFX B   nu          nid        nu
SFX B   nu          nais       nu
SFX B   nu          naist      nu
SFX B   nu          nodd       nu
SFX B   nu          asom       nu
SFX B   nu          asant      nu
SFX B   nu          asoch      nu
SFX B   nu          nwyd       nu
SFX B   nu          aswn       nu
SFX B   nu          asit       nu
SFX B   nu          aset       nu
SFX B   nu          asai       nu
SFX B   nu          asai'i     nu
SFX B   nu          asai'u     nu
SFX B   nu          asai'ch    nu
SFX B   nu          asai'n     nu
SFX B   nu          asai'r     nu
SFX B   nu          asem       nu
SFX B   nu          asech      nu
SFX B   nu          asent      nu
SFX B   nu          asid       nu
SFX B   nu          ned        nu
SFX B   nu          nwyf       nu
SFX B   nu          nych       nu
SFX B   nu          no         nu
SFX B   nu          no'i       nu
SFX B   nu          no'u       nu
SFX B   nu          no'ch      nu
SFX B   nu          no'n       nu
SFX B   nu          no'r       nu
SFX B   nu          nom        nu
SFX B   nu          noch       nu
SFX B   nu          nont       nu
SFX B   nu          ner        nu
SFX B   nu          nes        nu
SFX B   nu          nest       nu
SFX B   nu          nith       nu
SFX B   nu          niff       nu
SFX B   nu          non        nu
SFX B   nu          nan        nu
SFX B   io          naf        io
SFX B   io          ni         io
SFX B   io          ni'i       io
SFX B   io          ni'u       io
SFX B   io          ni'ch      io
SFX B   io          ni'n       io
SFX B   io          ni'r       io
SFX B   io          na         io
SFX B   io          na'i       io
SFX B   io          na'u       io
SFX B   io          na'ch      io
SFX B   io          na'n       io
SFX B   io          na'r       io
SFX B   io          nwn        io
SFX B   io          nwch       io
SFX B   io          nant       io
SFX B   io          nir        io
SFX B   io          nit        io
SFX B   io          net        io
SFX B   io          nai        io
SFX B   io          nai'i      io
SFX B   io          nai'u      io
SFX B   io          nai'ch     io
SFX B   io          nai'n      io
SFX B   io          nai'r      io
SFX B   io          nem        io
SFX B   io          nech       io
SFX B   io          nent       io
SFX B   io          nid        io
SFX B   io          nais       io
SFX B   io          naist      io
SFX B   io          nodd       io
SFX B   io          asom       io
SFX B   io          asant      io
SFX B   io          asoch      io
SFX B   io          nwyd       io
SFX B   io          aswn       io
SFX B   io          asit       io
SFX B   io          aset       io
SFX B   io          asai       io
SFX B   io          asai'i     io
SFX B   io          asai'u     io
SFX B   io          asai'ch    io
SFX B   io          asai'n     io
SFX B   io          asai'r     io
SFX B   io          asem       io
SFX B   io          asech      io
SFX B   io          asent      io
SFX B   io          asid       io
SFX B   io          ned        io
SFX B   io          nwyf       io
SFX B   io          nych       io
SFX B   io          no         io
SFX B   io          no'i       io
SFX B   io          no'u       io
SFX B   io          no'ch      io
SFX B   io          no'n       io
SFX B   io          no'r       io
SFX B   io          nom        io
SFX B   io          noch       io
SFX B   io          nont       io
SFX B   io          ner        io
SFX B   io          nes        io
SFX B   io          nest       io
SFX B   io          nith       io
SFX B   io          niff       io
SFX B   io          non        io
SFX B   io          nan        io
SFX B   o           naf        o
SFX B   o           ni         o
SFX B   o           ni'i       o
SFX B   o           ni'u       o
SFX B   o           ni'ch      o
SFX B   o           ni'n       o
SFX B   o           ni'r       o
SFX B   o           na         o
SFX B   o           na'i       o
SFX B   o           na'u       o
SFX B   o           na'ch      o
SFX B   o           na'n       o
SFX B   o           na'r       o
SFX B   o           nwn        o
SFX B   o           nwch       o
SFX B   o           nant       o
SFX B   o           nir        o
SFX B   o           nit        o
SFX B   o           net        o
SFX B   o           nai        o
SFX B   o           nai'i      o
SFX B   o           nai'u      o
SFX B   o           nai'ch     o
SFX B   o           nai'n      o
SFX B   o           nai'r      o
SFX B   o           nem        o
SFX B   o           nech       o
SFX B   o           nent       o
SFX B   o           nid        o
SFX B   o           nais       o
SFX B   o           naist      o
SFX B   o           nodd       o
SFX B   o           asom       o
SFX B   o           asant      o
SFX B   o           asoch      o
SFX B   o           nwyd       o
SFX B   o           aswn       o
SFX B   o           asit       o
SFX B   o           aset       o
SFX B   o           asai       o
SFX B   o           asai'i     o
SFX B   o           asai'u     o
SFX B   o           asai'ch    o
SFX B   o           asai'n     o
SFX B   o           asai'r     o
SFX B   o           asem       o
SFX B   o           asech      o
SFX B   o           asent      o
SFX B   o           asid       o
SFX B   o           ned        o
SFX B   o           nwyf       o
SFX B   o           nych       o
SFX B   o           no         o
SFX B   o           no'i       o
SFX B   o           no'u       o
SFX B   o           no'ch      o
SFX B   o           no'n       o
SFX B   o           no'r       o
SFX B   o           nom        o
SFX B   o           noch       o
SFX B   o           nont       o
SFX B   o           ner        o
SFX B   o           nes        o
SFX B   o           nest       o
SFX B   o           nith       o
SFX B   o           niff       o
SFX B   o           non        o
SFX B   o           nan        o
